Utah statutes.
63G-12-305.   Administrative actions -- Defenses.

(1)  On and after the program start date and in accordance with Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the department may bring agency action against a private employer who violates Subsection 63G-12-301(1) to impose a penalty described in Section 63G-12-306.

(2) (a)  To determine whether an employee is an unauthorized alien for purposes of Subsection (1), the department shall consider only the federal government's determination pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1373(c).

(b)  The federal government's determination creates a rebuttable presumption of the employee's lawful status.  The department may request the federal government to provide automated or testimonial verification pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1373(c).

(3)  For the purposes of this part, proof of verifying the employment authorization in accordance with Subsection 63G-12-301(2) creates a rebuttable presumption that an employer did not knowingly employ an unauthorized alien who does not hold a valid permit.

(4) (a)  For the purposes of this section, an employer that establishes that the employer has complied in good faith with the requirements of 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b) establishes an affirmative defense that the employer did not knowingly employ an unauthorized alien.

(b)  An employer is considered to have complied with the requirements of 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), notwithstanding an isolated, sporadic, or accidental technical or procedural failure to meet the requirements, if there is a good faith attempt to comply with the requirements.

